Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3145
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Pregnancy help organizations in the State of Nebraska and nationwide provide under-supported pregnant women with services, free of charge, that are crucial for their physical, emotional, and familial wellbeing, including pregnancy testing, pregnancy and prenatal care education, counseling, food, clothing, housing, transportation, parenting and life skills classes, child care, licensed medical care, and referrals to additional community services and material help;

(2) Pregnancy help organizations also provide personal relationships and a strong local support network for such women and their families that cannot be replicated by even the best and most effective government programs; and

(3) It shall be the policy of the State of Nebraska, through the creation of the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act, to encourage and celebrate pregnancy help organizations in this state and to incentivize private donations for the furtherance of their good work through the creation of a tax credit.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 25.